Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2026
Municipalities, counties, and agencies; regulate solid waste management; when.

In furtherance of the policy of the state as set forth in the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, municipalities, counties, and agencies may by ordinance or resolution adopt rules and regulations or may adopt bylaws or enter into written agreements between and among themselves or other persons which regulate and govern solid waste management within their solid waste jurisdiction areas, including the establishment of conditions to assure that a specified amount and type of solid waste will be delivered to a specific facility.

Laws 1984, LB 911, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-1572;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 26.